Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1118
Dental hygienists; application for license; examination; qualifications; license.

(1) Every applicant for a license to practice dental hygiene shall (a) present proof of graduation from an accredited dental hygiene program, (b) pass an examination approved by the Board of Dentistry which shall consist of the National Board Dental Hygiene Examination as constructed and administered by the American Dental Association Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations, (c) demonstrate the applicant's skill in clinical dental hygiene by passing the practical examination administered by the Central Regional Dental Testing Service or any other regional or state practical examination that the Board of Dentistry determines to be comparable to such practical examination, (d) pass a jurisprudence examination approved by the board that is based on the Nebraska statutes, rules, and regulations governing the practice of dentistry and dental hygiene, and (e) demonstrate continuing clinical competency as a condition of licensure if required by the board.

(2) Upon completion of these requirements, the department, with the recommendation of the board, shall issue the applicant a license to practice dental hygiene.

Laws 1949, c. 200, § 1, p. 582;

Laws 1953, c. 238, § 5, p. 827;

Laws 1973, LB 589, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 42;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 32;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 73;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-193.04;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 451.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.